Hawaii, session 2025, HB1305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the illegal use of fireworks poses significant public safety risks in Hawaii, creates serious injuries and health hazards, strains emergency services, and causes property damage.  The legislature also finds that, historically, public education and marketing campaigns have proven highly effective in changing public attitudes and behaviors.  For example, as a result of sustained smoking cessation campaigns against tobacco use, smoking rates among adults in the United States declined from forty-two per cent to twelve per cent between 1965 and 2022.  The legislature believes that a similar public education effort regarding fireworks safety may create lasting changes in community awareness, conduct, and public safety. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the department of education, in coordination with the department of health, to develop a fireworks education and marketing program for implementation in public schools and distribution to private schools. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart C to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A- Fireworks education and marketing program.  (a) The department, in coordination with the department of health, shall develop a fireworks education and marketing program devoted to fireworks safety. (b)  The department shall ensure that the program is implemented in department schools and charter schools.  The department shall also distribute the program to private kindergarten and grade schools in the State." SECTION 3.  Chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302D- Fireworks education and marketing program.  (a) Each charter school shall implement the fireworks education and marketing program developed by the department and the department of health pursuant to section 302A-   . (b)  The commission shall cooperate with the department in assisting in the implementation of the program." SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________